test/src/gt-desc-yamls/nounDES_gt-desc.ana.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup


# Comments after each noun:
# ok = checked against
# ? = not checked

# Nouns with Sub forms. Loan word lexicons with Err/Orth forms and some single words with Err/Orth, Err/Lex and and Err/Der tags

Tests: 

# Loan word lexicons with sub forms

#  Noun - biesske: # MUORRA
#    biesske+N+Sg+Nom: biesske
#    biesske+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Nom: []
#    biesske+N+Sg+Acc: bieskev
#    biesske+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Acc: biesskev
#    biesske+N+Sg+Ine: biesken
#    biesske+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Ine: []
#    biesske+N+Sg+Ill: bæsskáj
#    biesske+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Ill: []
#    biesske+N+Pl+Ine: bieskijn
#    biesske+N+Err/Orth+Pl+Ine: biesskijn
#    biesske+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: bæskásj
#    biesske+N+Err/Orth+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: biesskesj
#    biesske+N+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Nom: bæskálasj
#    biesske+N+Err/Orth+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Nom: [biesskelasj, bæsskálasj]
#    biesske+N+Der/Car+A+Sg+Nom: bieskedibme
#    biesske+N+Err/Orth+Der/Car+A+Sg+Nom: []
#    
#  Noun - tálla: # TÁLLA
#    tálla+N+Sg+Nom: tálla
#    tálla+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Nom: []
#    tálla+N+Sg+Ine: tállan
#    tálla+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Ine: tálan
#    tálla+N+Sg+Ill: tállaj
#    tálla+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Ill: []
#    tálla+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: tállasj
#    tálla+N+Err/Orth+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: tálasj
#    tálla+N+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Nom: tállalasj
#    tálla+N+Err/Orth+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Nom: tálalasj
#    tálla+N+Der/Car+A+Sg+Nom: tálladibme
#    tálla+N+Err/Orth+Der/Car+A+Sg+Nom: táladibme
#        
#  Noun - biesse: # TÁLLA
#    biesse+N+G3+Sg+Nom: biesse
#    biesse+N+G3+Err/Orth+Sg+Nom: []
#    biesse+N+G3+Sg+Ine: biessen
#    biesse+N+G3+Err/Orth+Sg+Ine: biesen
#    biesse+N+G3+Sg+Ill: bæssáj
#    biesse+N+G3+Err/Orth+Sg+Ill: []
#    biesse+N+G3+Pl+Ine: biessijn
#    biesse+N+G3+Err/Orth+Pl+Ine: biesijn
#    biesse+N+G3+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: bæssásj
#    biesse+N+G3+Err/Orth+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: bæsásj
#    biesse+N+G3+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Nom: bæssálasj
#    biesse+N+G3+Err/Orth+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Nom: [bieselasj, bæsálasj]
#    biesse+N+G3+Sg+Gen: biesse
#    biesse+N+G3+Err/Orth+Sg+Gen: biese
#    biesse+N+G3+Sg+Acc: biessev
#    biesse+N+G3+Err/Orth+Sg+Acc: biesev
#    biesse+N+G3+Sg+Ela: biesses
#    biesse+N+G3+Err/Orth+Sg+Ela: bieses
#    biesse+N+G3+Pl+Ill: biessijda
#    biesse+N+G3+Err/Orth+Pl+Ill: biesijda
#    biesse+N+G3+Der/Car+A+Sg+Nom: biessedibme
#    biesse+N+G3+Err/Orth+Der/Car+A+Sg+Nom: biesedibme
#
#  Noun - haŋŋá: # TÁLLA
#    haŋŋá+N+Sg+Nom: haŋŋá
#    haŋŋá+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Nom: []
#    haŋŋá+N+Sg+Ine: haŋŋán
#    haŋŋá+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Ine: haŋán
#    haŋŋá+N+Sg+Ill: haŋŋáj
#    haŋŋá+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Ill: []
#    haŋŋá+N+Pl+Ine: haŋŋájn
#    haŋŋá+N+Err/Orth+Pl+Ine: haŋájn
#    haŋŋá+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: haŋŋásj
#    haŋŋá+N+Err/Orth+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: haŋásj
#    haŋŋá+N+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Nom: haŋŋálasj
#    haŋŋá+N+Err/Orth+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Nom: haŋálasj
#    haŋŋá+N+Sg+Gen: haŋŋá
#    haŋŋá+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Gen: haŋá
#    haŋŋá+N+Sg+Acc: haŋŋáv
#    haŋŋá+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Acc: haŋáv
#    haŋŋá+N+Sg+Ela: haŋŋás
#    haŋŋá+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Ela: haŋás
#    haŋŋá+N+Pl+Ill: haŋŋájda
#    haŋŋá+N+Err/Orth+Pl+Ill: haŋájda
#
#  Noun - mæsso: # TÁLLA
#    mæsso+N+Sg+Nom: mæsso
#    mæsso+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Nom: []
#    mæsso+N+Sg+Ine: mæsson
#    mæsso+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Ine: mæson
#    mæsso+N+Sg+Ill: mæssuj
#    mæsso+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Ill: []
#    mæsso+N+Sg+Gen: mæsso
#    mæsso+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Gen: mæso
#    mæsso+N+Sg+Acc: mæssov
#    mæsso+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Acc: mæsov
#    mæsso+N+Sg+Ela: mæssos
#    mæsso+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Ela: mæsos
#    mæsso+N+Pl+Ill: mæssojda
#    mæsso+N+Pl+Ine: mæssojn 
#    mæsso+N+Err/Orth+Pl+Ine: mæsojn
#    mæsso+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: messusj
#    mæsso+N+Err/Orth+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: mesusj
#    mæsso+N+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Nom: messulasj
#    mæsso+N+Err/Orth+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Nom: mesulasj
#
#  Noun - hoasso: # TÁLLA
#    hoasso+N+Sg+Nom: hoasso
#    hoasso+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Nom: []
#    hoasso+N+Sg+Ine: hoasson
#    hoasso+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Ine: hoason
#    hoasso+N+Sg+Ill: hoassuj
#    hoasso+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Ill: []
#    hoasso+N+Pl+Ine: hoassojn
#    hoasso+N+Err/Orth+Pl+Ine: hoasojn
#    hoasso+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: håssusj
#    hoasso+N+Err/Orth+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: håsusj
#    hoasso+N+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Nom: håssulasj
#    hoasso+N+Err/Orth+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Nom: håsulasj
#    hoasso+N+Sg+Gen: hoasso
#    hoasso+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Gen: hoaso
#    hoasso+N+Sg+Acc: hoassov
#    hoasso+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Acc: hoasov
#    hoasso+N+Sg+Ela: hoassos
#    hoasso+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Ela: hoasos
#    hoasso+N+Pl+Ill: hoassojda
#    hoasso+N+Err/Orth+Pl+Ill: hoasojda
#    hoasso+N+Sg+Com: håssujn
#    hoasso+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Com: håsujn
#    
#  Noun - oassje: # TÁLLA
#    oassje+N+Sg+Nom: oassje
#    oassje+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Nom: []
#    oassje+N+Sg+Ine: oassjen
#    oassje+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Ine: oasjen
#    oassje+N+Sg+Ill: oassjáj
#    oassje+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Ill: []
#    oassje+N+Sg+Gen: oassje
#    oassje+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Gen: oasje
#    oassje+N+Sg+Acc: oassjev
#    oassje+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Acc: oasjev
#    oassje+N+Sg+Ela: oassjes
#    oassje+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Ela: oasjes
#    oassje+N+Sg+Com: åssjijn
#    oassje+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Com: åsjijn
#    oassje+N+Pl+Ill: åssjijda
#    oassje+N+Pl+Ine: åssjijn
#    oassje+N+Err/Orth+Pl+Ine: åsjijn
#    oassje+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: oassjásj
#    oassje+N+Err/Orth+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: oasjásj
#    oassje+N+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Nom: oassjálasj
#    oassje+N+Err/Orth+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Nom: oasjálasj
#    oassje+N+Der/Car+A+Sg+Nom: oassjedibme
#    oassje+N+Err/Orth+Der/Car+A+Sg+Nom: oasjádibme
#
#  Noun - droassja: # TÁLLA
#    droassja+N+Sg+Nom: droassja
#    droassja+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Nom: []
#    droassja+N+Sg+Ine: dråssjan
#    droassja+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Ine: dråsjan
#    droassja+N+Sg+Ill: droassjaj
#    droassja+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Ill: []
#    droassja+N+Sg+Gen: dråssja
#    droassja+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Gen: dråsja
#    droassja+N+Sg+Acc: dråssjav
#    droassja+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Acc: dråsjav
#    droassja+N+Sg+Ela: dråssjas
#    droassja+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Ela: dråsjas
#    droassja+N+Pl+Ill: dråssjajda
#    droassja+N+Pl+Ine: dråssjajn
#    droassja+N+Err/Orth+Pl+Ine: dråsjajn
#    droassja+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: dråssjasj
#    droassja+N+Err/Orth+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: dråsjasj
#    droassja+N+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Nom: dråssjalasj
#    droassja+N+Err/Orth+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Nom: dråsjalasj
#    droassja+N+Der/Car+A+Sg+Nom: dråssjadibme
#    droassja+N+Err/Orth+Der/Car+A+Sg+Nom: dråsjadibme
        
  Noun - bállemmasjijnna: # MASKIN
    bállemmasjijnna+N+Sg+Nom: bállemmasjijnna
    bállemmasjijnna+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Nom: bállemmásjijnna
    bállemmasjijnna+N+Sg+Ill: bállemmasjijnnaj
    bállemmasjijnna+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Ill: bállemmásjijnnaj
    bállemmasjijnna+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: bállemmasjijnasj
    bállemmasjijnna+N+Err/Orth+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: bállemmásjijnasj

  Noun - resymiedja: # KAFÉ
    resymiedja+N+Sg+Nom: [resymedja, resymiedja]
    resymiedja+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Nom: [resyméa, resymea]
    resymiedja+N+Sg+Ela: [resymejas, resymiejas]
    resymiedja+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Ela: [resyméas, resymeas]
    
  Noun - sosiolåvggå: # DEMAGOG
    sosiolåvggå+N+Sg+Nom: sosiolåvggå
    sosiolåvggå+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Nom: sosiologa
    sosiolåvggå+N+Sg+Ela: sosiolåvgås
    sosiolåvggå+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Ela: sosiologas
  
  Noun - sosiolåvggå: # DEMAGOG
    sosiolåvggå+N+Sg+Nom: [sociolåvggå, sosiolåvggå]
    sosiolåvggå+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Nom: [sociologa, sociologa]
    sosiolåvggå+N+Sg+Ela: [sociolåvgås, sociolåvgås]
    sosiolåvggå+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Ela: [sociologas, sociologas]
    
  Noun - stenografiddja: # ALLEGORI
    stenografijja+N+Sg+Nom: stenografijja
    stenografijja+N+Sg+Nom: stenografiddja
    stenografijja+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Nom: stenografija
    stenografijja+N+Sg+Ela: stenografijjas
    stenografijja+N+Sg+Ela: stenografidjas
    stenografijja+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Ela: stenografijas
  
  Noun - videotiehkka: # APOTEK
    videotiehkka+N+Sg+Nom: [videotæhkka, videotiehkka]
    videotiehkka+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Nom: videotehkka
    videotiehkka+N+Sg+Ela: [videotehkas, videotiehkas]
  
  Noun - fabrihkka: # ANTIKK
    fabrihkka+N+Sg+Nom: [fabrihkka, fabrijkka]
    fabrihkka+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Nom: [fábrihkka, fábrijkka]
    fabrihkka+N+Sg+Ine: [fabrihkan, fabrijkan]
    fabrihkka+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Ine: [fábrihkan, fábrijkan]
    fabrihkka+N+Sg+Ill: [fabrihkkaj, fabrijkkaj]
    fabrihkka+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Ill: [fábrihkkaj, fábrijkkaj]

  Noun - kolesteråvllå: # ALKOHOL
    kolesteråvllå+N+Sg+Nom: kolesteråvllå
    kolesteråvllå+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Nom: kolesterola
    kolesteråvllå+N+Sg+Ela: kolesteråvlås
    kolesteråvllå+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Ela: kolesterolas
   
  Noun - kromosåvmmå: # AGRONOM
    kromosåvmmå+N+Sg+Nom: kromosåvmmå
    kromosåvmmå+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Nom: kromosoma
    kromosåvmmå+N+Sg+Ela: kromosåvmås
    kromosåvmmå+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Ela: kromosomas
    
  Noun - metyliedna: # HYDROGEN
    metyliedna+N+Sg+Nom: [metyliedna, metyledna]
    metyliedna+N+Sg+Ela: [metylienas, metylenas]
    
  Noun - observaterra: # INSPEKTØR
    observaterra+N+Sg+Nom: observaterra
    observaterra+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Nom: observatørra
    observaterra+N+Sg+Ela: observateras
    observaterra+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Ela: observatøras
  
  Noun - originalitiehtta: # ALFABET
    originalitiehtta+N+Sg+Nom: [originalitæhtta, originalitiehtta]
    originalitiehtta+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Nom: originalitehtta
    originalitiehtta+N+Sg+Ela: [originalitehtas, originalitiehtas]
  
  Noun - ornamænnta: # PATENT
    ornamænnta+N+Sg+Nom: ornamænnta
    ornamænnta+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Nom: ornamennta
    ornamænnta+N+Sg+Ela: ornamentas

  Noun - nikkeleksiebma: # PATENT
    nikkeleksiebma+N+Sg+Nom: [nikkeleksiebma, nikkeleksebma, nickeleksebma, nickeleksiebma]
    nikkeleksiebma+N+Sg+Ela: [nikkeleksiemas, nikkeleksemas, nickeleksemas, nickeleksiemas]
  
  Noun - semænnta: # PATENT
    semænnta+N+Sg+Nom: [semænnta, semännta, cemænnta, cemännta]
    semænnta+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Nom: [semennta, cemennta]
    semænnta+N+Sg+Ine: [sementan, cementan]
    semænnta+N+Sg+Ill: [semænntaj, semänntaj, cemænntaj, cemänntaj]
    semænnta+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Ill: [semenntaj, semenntaj]
    semænnta+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: [sementasj, cementasj]
  

  Noun - diminutijvva: # ADJEKTIV
    diminutijvva+N+Sg+Nom: diminutijvva
    diminutijvva+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Nom: deminutijvva
    diminutijvva+N+Sg+Ine: diminutijvan
    diminutijvva+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Ine: deminutijvan
    diminutijvva+N+Sg+Ill: diminutijvvaj
    diminutijvva+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Ill: deminutijvvaj
    diminutijvva+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: diminutijvasj
    diminutijvva+N+Err/Orth+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: deminutijvasj

# single words with sub forms
   
  Noun - dåbddomærkka: # MUORRA, Err/Orth
    dåbddomærkka+N+Sg+Nom: [dåbddomærkka, dåbddomärkka]
    dåbddomærkka+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Nom: [dåbddåmærkka, dåbddåmärkka]
    dåbddomærkka+N+Sg+Ine: dåbddomerkan
    dåbddomærkka+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Ine: dåbddåmerkan
    dåbddomærkka+N+Sg+Ill: [dåbddomærkkaj, dåbddomärkkaj]
    dåbddomærkka+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Ill: [dåbddåmærkkaj, dåbddåmärkkaj]
    dåbddomærkka+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: dåbddomerkasj
    dåbddomærkka+N+Err/Orth+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: dåbddåmerkasj
     
  Noun - lihtar: # SÅHKÅR, ÅRES, Err/Orth
    lihtar+v1+N+Sg+Nom: lihtar
    lihtar+v2+N+Sg+Nom: lijtar
    lihtar+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Nom: [lijtar, lijter, lihter]
    lihtar+v1+N+Pl+Nom: lihttara
    lihtar+v2+N+Pl+Nom: lijttara
    lihtar+N+Err/Orth+Pl+Nom: [lijttára, lijttara, lihttára]
    lihtar+v1+N+Sg+Ill: lihttarij
    lihtar+v2+N+Sg+Ill: lijttarij
    lihtar+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Ill: [lijttarij, lijttárij, lihttárij]

  Noun - rássjosuoján: # GAHPER, Err/Orth 
    rássjosuoján+N+Sg+Nom: rássjosuoján
    rássjosuoján+N+Sg+Ine: rássjosuojánin
    rássjosuoján+N+Sg+Ill: rássjosuojánij

  Noun - elmihttár: # GAHPER, Err/Der
    elmihttár+N+Sg+Nom: elmihttár
    elmihttár+N+Sg+Ine: elmihttárin
    elmihttár+N+Sg+Ill: elmihttárij
